apertium-cy-en/apertium-cy-en.cy.dix.xml
    <pardef n="initial-m">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
          <r>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>m</l>
          <r>m</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-ll">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ll</l>
          <r>ll</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>ll</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>ll</l>
          <r>ll</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-rh">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>rh</l>
          <r>rh</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>rh</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>rh</l>
          <r>rh</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="initial-P">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>P</l>
          <r>P</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>B</l>
          <r>P</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Mh</l>
          <r>P</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Ph</l>
          <r>P</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>P</l>
          <r>P</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-B">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>B</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>F</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>M</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>B</l>
          <r>B</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-T">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>T</l>
          <r>T</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>D</l>
          <r>T</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Nh</l>
          <r>T</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Th</l>
          <r>T</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>T</l>
          <r>T</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-D">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>D</l>
          <r>D</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Dd</l>
          <r>D</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>N</l>
          <r>D</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>D</l>
          <r>D</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-C">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>C</l>
          <r>C</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>G</l>
          <r>C</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Ngh</l>
          <r>C</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Ch</l>
          <r>C</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>C</l>
          <r>C</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-G">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>G</l>
          <r>G</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Ng</l>
          <r>G</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>G</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>G</l>
          <r>G</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-M">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>M</l>
          <r>M</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>F</l>
          <r>M</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>M</l>
          <r>M</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initiaL-Ll">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Ll</l>
          <r>Ll</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>L</l>
          <r>Ll</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>Ll</l>
          <r>Ll</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="initial-Rh">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>Rh</l>
          <r>Rh</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>R</l>
          <r>Rh</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>Rh</l>
          <r>Rh</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="lleoliad"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>eoliad</i><par n="aberth__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lluniad"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>uniad</i><par n="aberth__n"/></e>
    <e lm="llymder"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>ymder</i><par n="aberth__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mesur"><par n="initial-m"/><i>esur</i><par n="aberth__n"/></e>
    <e lm="miligram"><par n="initial-m"/><i>iligram</i><par n="aberth__n"/></e>
    <e lm="monitor"><par n="initial-m"/><i>onitor</i><par n="aberth__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mynegiad"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ynegiad</i><par n="aberth__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rhediad"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>ediad</i><par n="aberth__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rhwystr"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>wystr</i><par n="aberth__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lleuad"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>euad</i><par n="actores__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meddyginiaeth"><par n="initial-m"/><i>eddyginiaeth</i><par n="actores__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rhedlefel"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>edlefel</i><par n="actores__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rhywogaeth"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>ywogaeth</i><par n="actores__n"/></e>
    <e lm="llanastr"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>anastr</i><par n="achosiant__n"/></e>
    <e lm="llond"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>ond</i><par n="achosiant__n"/></e>
    <e lm="marchnerth"><par n="initial-m"/><i>archnerth</i><par n="achosiant__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mwyn"><par n="initial-m"/><i>wyn</i><par n="achosiant__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rhyddid"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>yddid</i><par n="achosiant__n"/></e>
    <e lm="moes"><par n="initial-m"/><i>oes</i><par n="addysg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lles"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>es</i><par n="academydd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="modd"><par n="initial-m"/><i>odd</i><par n="academydd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rhagrybudd"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>agrybudd</i><par n="academydd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="llun"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>un</i><par n="amlap__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rhewbwynt"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>ewbwynt</i><par n="amlap__n"/></e>
    <e lm="manwerthwr"><par n="initial-m"/><i>anwerthw</i><par n="addasw/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="llu"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>u</i><par n="aber__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mynydd"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ynydd</i><par n="aber__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rhan"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>an</i><par n="adran__n"/></e>
    <e lm="llawiadur"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>awiadur</i><par n="achlysur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="modur"><par n="initial-m"/><i>odur</i><par n="achlysur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mantolen"><par n="initial-m"/><i>antolen</i><par n="amlen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rhifolyn"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>ifol</i><par n="ateg/yn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="llew"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>ew</i><par n="baban__n"/></e>
    <e lm="menyw"><par n="initial-m"/><i>enyw</i><par n="baban__n"/></e>
    <e lm="llythrdy"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>ythrd</i><par n="deond/y__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meillion"><par n="initial-m"/><i>eillion</i><par n="meillion__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rheilffordd"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>eilff</i><par n="ff/ordd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="llywiwr"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>yw</i><par n="llyw/iwr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="modiwl"><par n="initial-m"/><i>odi</i><par n="modi/wl__n"/></e>
    <e lm="llawen"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>awen</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="llenyddol"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>enyddol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lleyg"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>eyg</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="llosg"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>osg</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="llwyddiannus"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>wyddiannus</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="llyfn"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>yfn</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mân"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ân</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="masnachol"><par n="initial-m"/><i>asnachol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="melys"><par n="initial-m"/><i>elys</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="moethus"><par n="initial-m"/><i>oethus</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rhagddiffiniedig"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>agddiffiniedig</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rhai"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>ai</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rhediadol"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>ediadol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rhifol"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>ifol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rhwygadwy"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>wygadwy</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="rhyng-broffesiynol"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>yng-broffesiynol</i><par n="caredig__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="llachio"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>achi</i><par n="achlysur/o__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="llafnu"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>afn</i><par n="aberth/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="llathru"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>athr</i><par n="aberth/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="llefain"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>ef</i><par n="crochlefa/in__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="llesteirio"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>esteiri</i><par n="achlysur/o__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="llifo"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>if</i><par n="llif/o__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="llofnodi"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>ofnod</i><par n="achos/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lluniaethu"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>uniaeth</i><par n="aberth/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="llwyddo"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>wydd</i><par n="achlysur/o__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="llyfu"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>yf</i><par n="aberth/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="llythyru"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>ythyr</i><par n="aberth/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="maeneiddio"><par n="initial-m"/><i>aeneiddi</i><par n="achlysur/o__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mân-werthu"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ân-werth</i><par n="aberth/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mawrhau"><par n="initial-m"/><i>awrh</i><par n="adfywh/au__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="meidryddu"><par n="initial-m"/><i>eidrydd</i><par n="aberth/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mercheta"><par n="initial-m"/><i>erchet</i><par n="adar/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mewnosod"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ewnosod</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="moelio"><par n="initial-m"/><i>oeli</i><par n="achlysur/o__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mowntio"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ownti</i><par n="achlysur/o__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mwydro"><par n="initial-m"/><i>wydr</i><par n="achlysur/o__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mynegi"><par n="initial-m"/><i>yneg</i><par n="achos/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rhacanu"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>acan</i><par n="aberth/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rhagbenodi"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>agbenod</i><par n="achos/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rhagdybied"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>agdybi</i><par n="ailystyri/ed__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rhaglennu"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>aglenn</i><par n="absenn/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rhagrybuddio"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>agrybuddi</i><par n="achlysur/o__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rhechu"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>ech</i><par n="aberth/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rheoleiddio"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>eoleiddi</i><par n="achlysur/o__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rhibinio"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>ibini</i><par n="achlysur/o__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rhincio"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>inci</i><par n="achlysur/o__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rhodresu"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>odres</i><par n="aberth/u__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rhuddo"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>udd</i><par n="achlysur/o__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rhwyddhau"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>wyddh</i><par n="adfywh/au__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rhyfela"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>yfel</i><par n="adar/a__vblex"/></e>
